print/tex/TeX3.14/contrib/tex/hyphen/hyphen.dutch.min.tex
uit3sp
u1j
uk4e
uke3no
u2k3l
u2kor
u2kr
uk3ri
uks4h
uks4me
uk4taa
uk3w
u1la
ul3ac
uliet4
ul4kar
u1lo
ul4pak
ul2p3l
ul2po
ul4pr
ul4ps
ul4spa
ul4spu
ul4stel
u1lu2
u4mac
ummi3s
umpi4
un2c
un3che
un4e
une4tj
un3g
3unif
3univ
un4kr
un2s
un3sc
un3se
uns4t
unst3a
un4stei
unst3r
un4tag
un2tj
u3ol
u1or
4up
u1pa
upda4
u2pe.
u2pek
u4pen
u2pes
u1pl
u1po
u1pr
u1q
2ur
u1ra
ur3ac
ur2al
uras4t
u4rec
u4renv
ures4
ure4tj
ur2fa
ur3gl
u1ri
uri4c
4urie
u4rind
ur4kie
u1ro
u4ront
ur2sl
ur2sn
ur4spa
ur4spr
ur4sui
u1ru
u3ry
u1san
u2sc
u3s2cr
4use
u4sep
u4sj
u4s3l
us3n
u2so
u4s3p
us4se.
us4ses
u2st
us3te
us4tei
us3ti
us3tr
4ut
u1ta
ut2ad
u3tan
u4tees
u4tef
u4teks
u4tem
uter4n
u4tet
u2tex
uti4oni
uti2q
u1to
u1tr
uts4c
ut1sn
ut2sp
ut4sto
u1tu
uu2
uur1
uur3a
u1v
uvan4
uvel4s
uw1a
u4wec
u4wei
u4weko
u4wij
u4wind
u4wink
uw1o
uw3r
uwui2
u1z
uzes4
uziek3
va4kar
va2ki
vak3l
va2ko
va4loe
val4s3p
va2n
va3se
va3s4o
va4th
2vc
veel1
veep4
2vega4
veis4
ve4lap
vel4do
vel4dr
vel4d3u
ve4lis
ve2na
ven3k
ve2n3o
ven2s
ven4se
venti4o
ve2r
ver1a
ver3da
verdi4
ver3k4
ver3n
ver3p
ver3sa
ver3sm
ver3sp
ver3tw
ver1u
ve2s3
ves4c
ves4po
ve4st
ve4tem
ve2tj
ve4to
ve2tr
2vi2c
vi3ch
vie2s
vies3p
vie2w
vi4ne
ving4
4vi4ot
vi4san
vi4set
vi4sol
visper4
vi1tr
vi4val
2v1j
v2l
4vlar
vleis4
vle3s
vlooi4t
3vo
voel4s
voet3j
voe4tr
vo2le
vo2li
vol3ij
v4r2
vrij3k
vues4
vu2lo
waad1
w2ad
w2ag
3wagen
wa4la
wa4les
4wana
wan4gl
wa2n3o
wan3sm
3wap
war4tan
wart3j
war4to
wart3r
wa4s3p
watt3u
2w1b
w1c
2w1d
1we
we2a
we2b3a
we2d1i
we2dr
wee3lo
wee3sl
wee3sp
wees4t
we2g3a
weg3eb
we4gerv
weg3ij
weg3l
we2g3o
we2g3r
we4ka
we4kr
wel3ed
wel3ee
we2lo
wel3om
we3loo
wel3s4
we4mab
we2mi
we4mo
we2n
we3ne
we4nee
we4nem
wen4kas
wen3o
wer4gr
w4erk
wer4k3l
wer4k3o
wer4kr
wer4k3u
wer4k3w
wer4p3a
4werw
we2s
wes3p
w4et
we2th
2w1f
w1g
w1h
3wijd
wijs3
wi2k
3wil
wil4s
1win
win4d3r
3wink
win4kl
win2s
win4ta
wi4sec
1wi2t
wi3te
wit3h
wit3j
wit3o
wit3r
w1j
2w1k
2w1l
w1m
4wn
wn3ac
w3nes
w4oe
woe3i2
wo2l
wol2f
wolf4s3
worm3a
4wot
w1p
wper4
w2r
wri4
2w1s
w2sa
ws4k
w2sle
2w1t
w1v
wva2
4w1w
wwa4v
w1z
xan3
x1b
x1c
xchan4
xel4
xf4
x1h
xis4
x1k
xop4
x1p
x1t
x4tak
xtie4
xtraat4
xtu4r
xu1
x3v
x3w
xys4
y1a
y4ah
yan4c
y1b
yber4t
y1c
ycho3
y1d
y1e
y1f
yfu4
y1g
y3gl
ygu2
y3h
y1i
y1j
yl3al
y4les
y4let
yli4n
y1lo
ylo3s
ymfes4
ym4fl
ymor4
y3no
yn3t
yon4n
y1p
y4pec
y4ped
y4pek
y2pem
y4pev
y4pew
y1r
yr4e
y1sa
ys4h
ysha4
y2s3l
y1so
ys3t
ys4ty
y1t2
ytop4
y3v
yvet4
yvon4
y3w
y1z
3za
zaf4
za2k3a
za2ku
zan4da
zang3s
zas4
2zb
4zc
4zd
zee3g
zee3k
zee3le
zee3ro
zee3s4
zelf1
zen4da
ze2no
ze4raa
ze3roo
zer4sl
zer4sp
ze2s
ze3sc
zes3e
ze3sl
ze3str
ze4ta
ze2th
ze2ti
ze4tj
ze4tr
zeve2
zeven3
2zg
ziek3l
zie4kr
zie4kw
ziel4s3
zi4ga
zij4na
zijn4s
zings3
zin4si
zin4sl
zin4sm
zi4os
zi2t
2zk
z2l
2zm
zn4
zoet3j
zoe4tr
zo3f
zon3da
zo4nek
zon2s
zo2t
2zp
2zs
4zt
zus3
4zv
z2w
2z1z
}
